Missouri, session 2026, HB2031.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2047, to read as follows:
1.2047. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Children
Harmed by AI Technology Act" or the "CHAT Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Companion AI chatbot", any software-based artificial intelligence system
or program that exists for the primary purpose of simulating interpersonal or emotional
interaction, friendship, companionship, or therapeutic communication with a user;
(2) "Covered entity", any person that owns, operates, or otherwise makes
available a companion AI chatbot to individuals in this state;
(3) "Minor", any person under eighteen years of age;
(4) "Pop-up", a visible notification on the screen of a user that can be resolved if
interacted with by the user;
(5) "Sexually explicit communication", any content, conversation, or material
that describes, depicts, or encourages sexually explicit conduct;
(6) "Sexually suggestive communication", any oral, written, or behavioral action
with sexual undertones that implies sexual intent.
3. A covered entity shall require each individual accessing a companion AI
chatbot to make a user account in order to use or otherwise interact with such chatbot.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2031 2
4. (1) With respect to each user account of a companion AI chatbot that exists as
of August 28, 2026, a covered entity shall:
(a) On such date, freeze any such account;
(b) In order to restore the functionality of such account, require that the user
provide age information that is verifiable using a commercially available method or
process that is reasonably designed to ensure accuracy; and
(c) Using such age information, classify each user as a minor or an adult.
(2) At the time an individual creates a new user account to use or interact with a
companion AI chatbot, a covered entity shall:
(a) Request age information from the individual; and
(b) Verify the individual's age using a commercially available method or process
that is reasonably designed to ensure accuracy.
(3) If the age verification process described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection determines that a user is a minor, a covered entity shall:
(a) Require the account of such user to be affiliated with a parental account,
which such covered entity has verified using a commercially available method or process
that is reasonably designed to ensure accuracy;
(b) Obtain verifiable parental consent from the holder of the account before
allowing a minor to access and use the companion AI chatbot; and
(c) Block the minor's access to any companion AI chatbot that engages in a
sexually explicit communication or sexually suggestive communication.
(4) A covered entity shall protect the confidentiality of age information provided
by a user for age verification by limiting the collection, processing, use, and storage of
such information to what is strictly necessary to verify a user's age, obtain verifiable
parental consent, or maintain compliance records.
(5) At the beginning of any interaction between a user and a companion AI
chatbot, and not less frequently than every sixty minutes during such interaction
thereafter, a covered entity shall display to such user a clear pop-up that notifies the
user that they are not engaging in dialogue with a human counterpart.
5. (1) No later than one hundred eighty days after August 28, 2026, the attorney
general shall issue guidance to assist covered entities in complying with the
requirements of this section.
(2) In any enforcement action brought under this section, the attorney general
shall allege a specific violation of a provision of this section. The attorney general shall
not base an enforcement action on, or execute a consent order based on, practices that
are alleged to be inconsistent with any guidance issued by the attorney general with

HB 2031 3
respect to this section unless the practices are alleged to violate a provision of this
section. A person may use such guidance as evidence of compliance with this section.
6. In any case in which the attorney general has reason to believe that an interest
of the residents of this state has been or is threatened or adversely affected by the
engagement of any person in a practice that violates this section, the attorney general, as
parens patriae, may bring a civil action on behalf of the residents of this state in a circuit
court of this state with appropriate jurisdiction to:
(1) Enjoin that practice;
(2) Enforce compliance with the requirements of this section;
(3) Obtain damages, restitution, or other compensation on behalf of residents of
this state; or
(4) Obtain such other relief as the court may consider to be appropriate.
7. For purposes of bringing any civil action under subsection 6 of this section,
nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the attorney general from exercising
the powers conferred on the attorney general to:
(1) Conduct investigations;
(2) Serve civil investigative demands;
(3) Administer oaths or affirmations; or
(4) Compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documentary and
other evidence.
8. A covered entity is deemed not liable for a violation of this section if the
covered entity demonstrates it has:
(1) Relied in good faith on age information provided by a user of the companion
AI chatbot for purposes of verifying the age of such user;
(2) Complied with the guidance described in subsection 5 of this section; and
(3) Reasonably conformed to widely accepted industry standards or best
practices for age verification and applied those standards or best practices consistently
and in good faith.
✔